Tennessee, session 114, SB1747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who recklessly discharges a firearm into the
air, ground, a body of water, or an object in proximity to the person if the firearm is
discharged at a place of public gathering or at a public event where there are at least
twenty-five (25) people in attendance at the time of the discharge.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) This section does not apply if the firearm is discharged:
(1) By an officer of the state, or any county, city, or town, charged with
the enforcement of the laws of this state, when in the discharge of the officer's
official duties;
(2) By persons employed by the army, air force, navy, space force, coast
guard, or marine service of the United States or any member of the Tennessee
national guard when in discharge of the person's official duties and acting under
orders requiring the person to carry a firearm;
(3) As required by an animal control officer, rabies control officer, or
Tennessee wildlife resources agency (TWRA) officer when in the discharge of
the officer's official duties;
(4) To lawfully take wildlife by permit or license during an open season
established by the Tennessee wildlife resources agency;
SB1747
009294
- 1 -

(5) For the control of nuisance wildlife by permit from the TWRA or the
United States fish and wildlife service;
(6) On the property of a public or privately owned sport shooting range,
as defined in § 39-17-316;
(7) In defense of self or another person against an animal attack if a
reasonable person would believe that deadly force against the animal is
immediately necessary and reasonable under the circumstances to protect
oneself or the other person; or
(8) In defense of a domestic animal against an imminent or ongoing
animal attack if a reasonable person would believe that deadly force against the
animal is immediately necessary and reasonable under the circumstances to
protect the domestic animal from attack.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009294